Illinois, session 104th, SB2762.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-446)8    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 9including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 10of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 11coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 12benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 13health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 14under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 15356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 16356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 17356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 18356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 19356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 20356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, 21and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 22356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, and 356z.89 of the Illinois 23Insurance Code. The coverage shall comply with Sections   SB2762 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance 2Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 3requirements of this Section. The requirement that health 4benefits be covered as provided in this Section is an 5exclusive power and function of the State and is a denial and 6limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the 7Illinois Constitution. A home rule county to which this 8Section applies must comply with every provision of this 9Section. 10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 188-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 19eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 20103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 216-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 221-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 23eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1-7-26.) 24    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-446)25    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county,   SB2762 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 2of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 3coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 4benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 5health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 6under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 7356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 8356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 9356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 10356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 11356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 12356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, 13and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 14356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, and 356z.89 of the Illinois 15Insurance Code. The coverage shall comply with Sections 16155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 370c, and 370c.4 of the Illinois 17Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 18requirements of this Section. The requirement that health 19benefits be covered as provided in this Section is an 20exclusive power and function of the State and is a denial and 21limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the 22Illinois Constitution. A home rule county to which this 23Section applies must comply with every provision of this 24Section. 25    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 26any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance   SB2762 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 2Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 3Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 4whatever reason, is unauthorized. 5(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 6103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 78-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 8eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 9103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 106-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 111-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 12eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-446, eff. 6-1-26; 13revised 1-7-26.) 14    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 15changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 16    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)17    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-446)18    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 19municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 20self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 21coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 22coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 23covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 24Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g,   SB2762 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 2356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 3356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 4356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 5356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 6356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 7356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77, 8356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, 9356z.85, 356z.88, and 356z.89 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 10The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 11356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 12Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 13Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 14provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 15the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 16Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 17rule municipality to which this Section applies must comply 18with every provision of this Section. 19    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 20any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 21with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 22Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 23Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 24whatever reason, is unauthorized. 25(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 26103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff.   SB2762 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b18-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 2eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 3103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 46-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 51-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 6eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1-8-26.) 7    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-446)8    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 9municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 10self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 11coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 12coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 13covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 14Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 15356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 16356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 17356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 18356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 19356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 20356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 21356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77, 22356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, 23356z.85, 356z.88, and 356z.89 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 24The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 25356z.19, 370c, and 370c.4 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The   SB2762 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 2Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 3provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 4the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 5Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 6rule municipality to which this Section applies must comply 7with every provision of this Section. 8    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 9any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 10with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 11Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 12Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 13whatever reason, is unauthorized. 14(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 15103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 168-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 17eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 18103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 196-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 201-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 21eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-446, eff. 6-1-26; 22revised 1-8-26.) 23    Section 15. The School Code is amended by changing Section 2410-22.3f as follows:   SB2762 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-446)3    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 4protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 5post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 6policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 7the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 8356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 9356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 10356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 11356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 12356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 13356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 14356z.74, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 15356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, and 356z.89 of the 16Illinois Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with 17Section 356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage 18shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c and Article 19XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 20Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. 21    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 22any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 23with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 24Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 25Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 26whatever reason, is unauthorized.   SB2762 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 2103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 38-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 4eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 5103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 66-9-25; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 71-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 8eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 9revised 1-8-26.) 10    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-446)11    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 12protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 13post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 14policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 15the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 16356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 17356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 18356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 19356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 20356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 21356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 22356z.74, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 23356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, and 356z.89 of the 24Illinois Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with 25Section 356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage   SB2762 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 370c, and 370c.4 and 2Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department 3of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. 4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 128-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 13eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 14103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 156-9-25; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 161-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 17eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 18104-446, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-8-26.) 19    Section 20. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 20adding Sections 356z.88 and 356z.89 as follows: 21    (215 ILCS 5/356z.88 new)22    Sec. 356z.88. Coverage for seizure detection devices.23    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "seizure detection 24device" means a monitoring device cleared by the United States   SB2762 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1Food and Drug Administration, and any related technology, 2application, service, or subscription supporting the 3prescribed use of the device, that provides the following:4        (1) individual monitoring and alert services relating 5    to seizure activity;6        (2) detection or prediction of seizure activity and 7    transmission of notification of the seizure activity to 8    the individual or a caregiver for appropriate medical 9    response; or10        (3) collection of data of the seizure activity of the 11    individual that can be used by a health care provider to 12    diagnose or appropriately treat a health care condition 13    that causes the seizure activity.14    (b) A group or individual plan of accident and health 15insurance or managed care plan amended, delivered, issued, or 16renewed on or after January 1, 2029 shall provide coverage for 17medically prescribed seizure detection devices.18    (c) All seizure detection devices covered under this 19Section shall be approved for use by individuals, and the 20choice of device shall be made based upon the individual's 21circumstances and medical needs in consultation with the 22individual's medical provider.23    (d) Any individual who has been prescribed a seizure 24detection device shall not be required to obtain prior 25authorization for coverage for a seizure detection device, and 26coverage shall be continuous once the seizure detection device   SB2762 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1is prescribed.2    (e) A group or individual policy of accident and health 3insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 4issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2029 shall not impose 5a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other 6cost-sharing requirement of more than $50 on the coverage of a 7seizure detection device per plan year. The provisions of this 8subsection do not apply to coverage under this Section to the 9extent that the coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 10health plan from eligibility for a health savings account. 11    (215 ILCS 5/356z.89 new)12    Sec. 356z.89. Coverage for preeclampsia biomarker testing. 13Any group or individual policy of accident and health 14insurance or managed care plan amended, delivered, issued, or 15renewed on or after January 1, 2028 shall cover, without 16imposing a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other 17cost-sharing requirement upon the insured, preeclampsia 18biomarker testing for predictive screening in asymptomatic 19individuals, or for diagnosis and management when symptoms are 20present. 21    Section 25. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 22amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 23    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)  SB2762 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1    Sec. 5-3. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. 2    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 3the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 4141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 5152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 6155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355.7, 355b, 355c, 356f, 7356g, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 8356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 9356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 10356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 11356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 12356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 13356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 14356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 15356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 16356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 17356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 18356z.76, 356z.77, 356z.78, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 19356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 356z.89, 364, 364.01, 20364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 21370a, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 22409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of 23Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, 24XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance 25Code.26    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except   SB2762 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 2Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 3are deemed to be "domestic companies":4        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 5    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;6        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 7    State; or8        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 9    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 10    of this State, except a corporation subject to 11    substantially the same requirements in its state of 12    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 13    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.14    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 15acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 16pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,17        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 18    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 19    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 20    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 21    acquisition of control takes effect;22        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 23    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 24    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 25    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 26    acquisition of control, need not take into account the   SB2762 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 2    other acquisition of control;3        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 4    following information:5            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 6        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 7        Organization sought to be acquired;8            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 9        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 10        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 11        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 12        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 13        forma financial statements reflecting projected 14        combined operation for a period of 2 years;15            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 16        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 17        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 18        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and19            (D) such other information as the Director shall 20        require.21    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 22Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 23any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 24enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 25maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 26to its health care certificates).  SB2762 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1    (e) In considering any management contract or service 2agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 3Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 4specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 5take into account the effect of the management contract or 6service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 7and the financial condition of the health maintenance 8organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 9into account the effect of the management contract or service 10agreement on competition.11    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 12Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 13Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 14defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 15Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 16group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 17additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:18        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 19    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 20    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 21    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 22    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 23    not be less than one year); and24        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 25    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 26    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with   SB2762 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 2    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 3    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 4    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 5    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 6    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 7    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 8    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 9    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 10    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 11    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 12    plan years.13    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 14statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 15describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 16and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 17the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 18to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 19profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 20unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 21or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 22experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 23the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 24enrollment unit.25    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 26Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any   SB2762 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 2refund authorized under this Section.3    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 4if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 5accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 6Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 7Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 8adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 9(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-420, eff. 111-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, 12eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 13103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 141-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 15eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 16103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 171-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, 18eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, 19eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 20104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 8-15-25; 104-379, eff. 211-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 22    Section 30. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 23amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 24    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)  SB2762 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 2health service organizations shall be subject to the 3provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 4141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 5154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 6355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 7356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 8356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 9356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 10356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.83, 11356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 356z.89, 364.3, 368a, 370a, 401, 12401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 13Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, 14XXVI, and XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in 15this Section shall require a limited health care plan to cover 16any service that is not a limited health service. For purposes 17of the Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 18444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 19organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 20domestic companies:21        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or22        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 23    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 24    of this State, except a corporation subject to 25    substantially the same requirements in its state of 26    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII   SB2762 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.2(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 3103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 41-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, 5eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 6103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 71-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-42, 8eff. 8-1-25; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 9104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 108-15-25; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1111-21-25.) 12    Section 35. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 13amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 14    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)15    Sec. 10. Application of Illinois Insurance Code 16provisions. Health services plan corporations and all persons 17interested therein or dealing therewith shall be subject to 18the provisions of Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 19133, 136, 139, 140, 143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 20354, 355.2, 355.3, 355.7, 355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 21356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 22356z.1, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 23356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 24356z.15, 356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26,   SB2762 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 2356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 3356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 4356z.68, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.79, 5356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 356z.89, 6364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 7408, 408.2, and 412, and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 8of the Illinois Insurance Code.9    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 10any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 11with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 12Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 13Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 14whatever reason, is unauthorized. 15(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 16103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 178-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, 18eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 19103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 201-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, 21eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-73, 22eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 23104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 248-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 25    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes   SB2762 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 16499 BAB 29895 b1changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 2that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 3represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 4not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 5made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 6Public Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.